Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.010

Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall have no application to cities and towns which at the present time have provided for civil service in the police department or which shall subsequently provide for civil service in the police department by local charter or other regulations which said local charter or regulations substantially accomplish the purpose of this chapter, nor to cities having a police force of not more than two persons including the chief of police.

[ 1937 c 13 s 1; RRS s 9558a-1.]